Washington statutes.
RCW 9.12.020

Buying, demanding, or promising reward by district judge or deputy.

Every district judge or deputy who shall, directly or indirectly, buy or be interested in buying anything in action for the purpose of commencing a suit thereon before a district judge, or who shall give or promise any valuable consideration to any person as an inducement to bring, or as a consideration for having brought, a suit before a district judge, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1987 c 202 s 138; 1909 c 249 s 119; RRS s 2371.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.